SuffixAgr.lexc
LEXICON SuffixAgr
-1sg:-no Suffixtag ;
-2sg:-pi Suffixtag ;
-3sg.m:-ri Suffixtag ;
-3sg.f:-ru Suffixtag ;
-1/2pl:-i Suffixtag ;
-3pl.m:-ri-na Suffixtag ;
-3pl.f:-ru-na Suffixtag ;
@U.SUFFIX.NO@ # ;

LEXICON Suffixtag
@U.SUFFIX.YES@ Suffixfunction ;
 
LEXICON Suffixfunction
@U.TV.YES@ Suffobj ;
@U.SIV.YES@ Suffsubj ;

LEXICON Suffobj
.obj:0 # ;

LEXICON Suffsubj
.subj:0 # ;
